Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2391
Security; delivery requirements; perfection.

(1) Securities pledged or securities in which a security interest has been granted pursuant to section 77-2389 shall be delivered to and held by a federal reserve bank or by a branch of a federal reserve bank, a federal home loan bank, or another responsible bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, including a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution chartered by a foreign state agency as defined in subdivision (14) of section 8-101.03, or trust company, other than the pledgor or the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution granting the security interest, as designated by the governing authority, with appropriate joint custody and the pledge agreement or security interest as described in subsection (2) of this section, in a form approved by the governing authority.

(2) The delivery by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution designated as a depository to the custodial official of a written receipt or acknowledgment from a federal reserve bank or branch of a federal reserve bank, a federal home loan bank, or another bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, including a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution chartered by a foreign state agency as defined in subdivision (14) of section 8-101.03, or trust company, other than the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution granting the security interest, that includes the title of such custodial official, describes the securities identified on the books or records of the depository, and provides that the securities or the proceeds of the securities will be delivered only upon the surrender of the written receipt or the acknowledgment duly executed by the custodial official designated on the written receipt or the acknowledgment and by the authorized representative of the depository shall, together with the custodial official's actual and continued possession of the written receipt or acknowledgment, constitute a valid and perfected security interest in favor of the custodial official in and to the identified securities.

(3) Articles 8 and 9, Uniform Commercial Code, shall not apply to any security interest arising under this section.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 275, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 44;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 41;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 86;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 1.